test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_I_bimisewanakid_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: ibimisewanakidishinaanibaning
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ibimisewanakidishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ibimisewanakidishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ibimisewanakidishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ibimisewanakidishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ibimisewanakidishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ibimisewanakidishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ibimisewanakidishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ibimisewanakidishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ibimisewanakidishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ibimisewanakidishiniibanan
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ibimisewanakidishiniibanag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ibimisewanakidishiniibaning
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ibimisewanakidishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ibimisewanakidishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbimisewanakid+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ibimisewanakidishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidensimishinaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidensimishiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidensimishiniiban
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidensimishini***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: bimisewanakidenhimishinaaniban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: bimisewanakidenhimishiwaaiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: bimisewanakidenhimishiniiban
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: bimisewanakidenhimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidensimishinaanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidensimishinaanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidensimishinaaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensimishiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensimishiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensimishiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidensimishinian
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidensimishiniag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidensimishiniing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimishinaanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimishinaanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimishinaaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimishiwaaan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimishiwaaag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimishiwaaing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimishinian
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimishiniag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensimishibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensimishibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensimishibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensimish***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensimish***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensimish***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimishibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimishibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimishibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimish***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensiminaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensiminaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensiminaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensimiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensimiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensimiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensiminiibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensiminiibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensiminiibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensimini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensimini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensimini***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiminaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiminaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiminaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhiminiibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhiminiibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhiminiibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhimini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensishinaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensishinaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensishinaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensishiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensishiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensishiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidensishiniibanan
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidensishiniibanag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidensishiniibaning
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidensishini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidensishini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidensishini***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishinaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishinaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishinaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishiniibanan
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishiniibanag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishiniibaning
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidenhishini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidimishinaanibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidimishinaanibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidimishinaanibaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidimishiwaaibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidimishiwaaibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidimishiwaaibaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: bimisewanakidimishiniibanan
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: bimisewanakidimishiniibanag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: bimisewanakidimishiniibaning
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: bimisewanakidimishini***idig, idog***an
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: bimisewanakidimishini***idig, idog***ag
     bimisewanakid+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: bimisewanakidimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
